Nevada, session 83, SB253.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385A.720 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.720 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3:
(a) Based upon the information received from the Department
pursuant to NRS 385A.670, the board of trustees of each school
district shall, on or before August 15 of each year, issue a
preliminary rating for each public school in the school district in
accordance with the statewide system of accountability for public
schools, excluding charter schools sponsored by the State Public
Charter School Authority, a college or university within the Nevada
System of Higher Education or a city or county.
(b) The board of trustees shall make preliminary ratings for all
charter schools that are sponsored by the board of trustees.
(c) The Department shall make preliminary ratings for all
charter schools sponsored by the State Public Charter School
Authority, all charter schools sponsored by a college or university
within the Nevada System of Higher Education and all charter
schools sponsored by a city or county.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3:
(a) Before making a final rating for a school, the board of
trustees of the school district or the Department, as applicable, shall
provide the school an opportunity to review the data upon which the
preliminary rating is based and to present evidence.
(b) If the school is a public school of the school district or a
charter school sponsored by the board of trustees, the board of
trustees of the school district shall, in consultation with the
Department, make a final determination concerning the rating for
the school on September 15.
(c) If the school is a charter school sponsored by the State Public
Charter School Authority, a college or university within the Nevada
System of Higher Education or a city or county, the Department
shall make a final determination concerning the rating for the school
on September 15.
3. The Department may temporarily waive or otherwise pause
the requirement to make ratings for public schools that comply with
20 U.S.C. § 6311(c) pursuant to this section if the United States
Department of Education grants a waiver from or otherwise pauses
the requirements of 20 U.S.C. § 6311(c).
4. On or before September 15 of each year, the Department
shall post on the Internet website maintained by the Department the
determinations and final ratings made for all schools in this State [.]
and a ranked list of the top 10 elementary schools, middle schools
-
*SB253*

– 4 –
and high schools in the State based on the determinations and
final ratings.
Sec. 2. NRS 387.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.195 1. Each board of county commissioners shall levy a
tax of 75 cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable
property within the county for the support of the public schools.
2. The tax collected pursuant to subsection 1 on any assessed
valuation attributable to the net proceeds of minerals must not be
considered as available to pay liabilities of the fiscal year in which
the tax is collected but must be deferred for use in the subsequent
fiscal year.
3. In addition to any tax levied in accordance with subsection
1, each board of county commissioners shall levy a tax for the
payment of interest and redemption of outstanding bonds of the
county school district [.] , the payment of interest and redemption
of outstanding bonds of a charter school in the county and for
charter school facilities in the county.
4. The tax collected pursuant to subsection 1 and any interest
earned from the investment of the proceeds of that tax must be
remitted by the county treasurer to the State Treasurer for credit to
the State Education Fund.
5. The tax collected pursuant to subsection 3 and any interest
earned from the investment of the proceeds of that tax must be
credited to the county school district’s debt service fund [.] and the
State Public Charter School Facility Fund created by section 5 of
this act.
Sec. 3. Chapter 388A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4 and 5 of this act.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby created the Charter School
Facilities Account in the State General Fund for the acquisition,
improvement and maintenance of facilities of charter schools
operating in this State.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall administer
the Account.
3. To the extent money is available in the Account, the
Department shall, for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and each fiscal year
thereafter, distribute the money in the Account in the following
manner:
(a) For pupils qualifying as eligible for free and reduced-price
meals pursuant to the National School Lunch Program, 42 U.S.C.
§§ 1751 et seq., an amount of $600 per school year per pupil:
(1) Attending a charter school on a full-time, in person
basis; and
-
*SB253*

– 5 –
(2) Attending a charter school providing a program of
distance education, reduced proportionally by the number of days
each pupil is expected to not attend the charter school in person.
(b) For pupils not qualifying as eligible for free and reduced-
price meals pursuant to the National School Lunch Program, 42
U.S.C. §§ 1751 et seq., an amount of $300 per school year per
pupil:
(1) Attending a charter school on a full-time, in person
basis; and
(2) Attending a charter school providing a program of
distance education, reduced proportionally by the number of days
each pupil is expected to not attend the charter school in person.
4. If there is an insufficient amount of money in the Account
to fully fund the distributions projected to be made pursuant to
subsection 3 in any fiscal year, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall proportionally reduce the amount of all such
distributions.
5. The interest and income earned on money in the Account,
after deducting any applicable charges must be credited to the
Account.
6. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Charter school” does not include a charter school for
distance education as defined in NRS 388A.705.
(b) “Program of distance education” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 388.829.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby created as a special revenue fund
in the State Treasury the State Public Charter School Facility
Fund to be administered by the Executive Director of the State
Public Charter School Authority. The tax collected pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 387.195 for the payment of interest and
redemption of outstanding bonds of a charter school and for
charter school facilities must be deposited in the State Treasury
for credit to the State Public Charter School Facility Fund.
2. All interest and income earned from the money in the
Fund must be credited to the Fund.
3. Claims against the Fund must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
4. Money in the Fund must be used to meet existing or future
obligations of the State and for the following purposes:
(a) Construction, design or purchase of new and existing
buildings for use by a public charter school, including, without
-
*SB253*

– 6 –
limitation, teacherages, dormitories, dining halls, gymnasiums and
stadiums.
(b) Enlarging, remodeling or repairing existing buildings or
grounds for a public charter school, including, without limitation,
teacherages, dormitories, dining halls, gymnasiums and stadiums.
(c) Acquiring sites for building schools, or additional real
property for necessary purposes related to schools, including,
without limitation, playgrounds, athletic fields and sites for
stadiums.
(d) Renting or leasing a facility for the use of a charter school.
5. Any money disbursed from the Fund must be used for the
needs of charter schools in the county from which the tax revenue
was collected pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 387.195 and
deposited into the Fund pursuant to subsection 1.
6. As used in this section, “charter school” does not include a
charter school for distance education as defined in NRS 388A.705.
Sec. 6. NRS 391.470 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.470 1. On or before August 1 of each year, the board of
trustees of each school district shall submit a report to the State
Board and the Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada created by
NRS 391.455 concerning [the] :
(a) The implementation and effectiveness of the process for peer
observations of teachers set forth in the regulations adopted by the
State Board pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection 2 of NRS
391.465, including, without limitation, any recommendations for
revisions to the process of peer observations.
(b) Teacher performance evaluations based on the statewide
performance evaluation system established by the State Board
pursuant to NRS 391.465, including, without limitation, a list of
the top 10 percent of elementary school, middle school and high
school teachers in each district.
2. On or before September 15 of each year, the Department
shall post on the Internet website maintained by the Department
the top 10 percent of elementary school, middle school and high
school teachers in each district as reported pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 7. NRS 278C.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278C.250 1. After the effective date of the ordinance adopted
pursuant to NRS 278C.220:
(a) Any taxes levied upon taxable property in the tax increment
area each year by or for the benefit of the State, the municipality and
any public body must be divided as follows:
(1) That portion of the taxes that would be produced by the
rate upon which the tax is levied each year by or for each of those
taxing agencies upon the total sum of the assessed value of the
-
*SB253*

– 7 –
taxable property in the tax increment area as shown upon the last
equalized assessment roll used in connection with the taxation of the
property by the taxing agency, must be allocated to and when
collected must be paid into the funds of the respective taxing
agencies as taxes by or for the taxing agencies on all other property
are paid.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the portion
of the taxes levied each year in excess of the amount determined
pursuant to subparagraph (1) must be allocated to, and when
collected must be paid into, the tax increment account pertaining to
the undertaking to pay the bond requirements of loans, money
advanced to, or indebtedness, whether funded, refunded, assumed or
otherwise, incurred by the municipality to finance or refinance, in
whole or in part, the undertaking. Unless the total assessed valuation
of the taxable property in the tax increment area exceeds the total
assessed value of the taxable property in the area as shown by the
last equalized assessment roll referred to in this subsection, all of the
taxes levied and collected upon the taxable property in the area must
be paid into the funds of the respective taxing agencies. When the
loans, advances and indebtedness, if any, and interest thereon, have
been paid, all money thereafter received from taxes upon the taxable
property in the tax increment area must be paid into the funds of the
respective taxing agencies as taxes on all other property are paid.
(b) If the undertaking is a natural resources project or a rail
project for which the municipality has received approval from the
Interim Finance Committee pursuant to NRS 278C.157, any taxes
levied upon the sale or use of tangible personal property in the tax
increment area each year by or for the benefit of the State, the
municipality and any public body must be divided as follows:
(1) That portion of the taxes that would be produced by the
rate upon which the tax is levied each year by or for each of those
taxing agencies upon the total sum of the sales and use of tangible
personal property in the tax increment area in the fiscal year
immediately preceding the effective date of the ordinance adopted
pursuant to NRS 278C.220, must be allocated to and when collected
must be paid into the funds of the respective taxing agencies as
taxes by or for the taxing agencies on all other sales of tangible
personal property are paid.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, of the
portion of the taxes levied each year in excess of the amount
determined pursuant to subparagraph (1), 50 percent of that amount
must be allocated to, and when collected must be paid into the tax
increment account pertaining to the undertaking to pay the bond
requirements of loans, money advanced to, or indebtedness, whether
funded, refunded, assumed or otherwise, incurred by the
-
*SB253*

– 8 –
municipality to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, the
undertaking. The remaining 50 percent of that amount must be
allocated to and when collected must be paid into the funds of the
respective taxing agencies as taxes by or for the taxing agencies on
all other sales of tangible personal property are paid. Unless the total
amount of the taxes imposed on the sale and use of tangible personal
property in the tax increment area exceeds the total amount of the
taxes imposed on the sale and use of tangible personal property in
the tax increment area in the fiscal year immediately preceding the
effective date of the ordinance adopted pursuant to NRS 278C.220,
all of the taxes levied and collected upon the sale or use of tangible
personal property in the tax increment area must be paid into the
funds of the respective taxing agencies. When the loans, advances
and indebtedness, if any, and interest thereon, have been paid, all
money thereafter received from taxes upon the sale or use of
tangible personal property in the tax increment area must be paid
into the funds of the respective taxing agencies as taxes on all other
taxes on the sale or use of tangible personal property are paid.
(c) If the undertaking is a natural resources project or a rail
project for which the municipality has received approval from the
Interim Finance Committee pursuant to NRS 278C.157, any taxes
imposed pursuant to NRS 363A.130 or 363B.110 on employers
located in the tax increment area must be divided as follows:
(1) That portion of the taxes that would be produced by the
rate upon which the tax is imposed each year by the Department of
Taxation in the fiscal year immediately preceding the effective date
of the ordinance adopted pursuant to NRS 278C.220, must be
allocated to and when collected must be paid to the Department of
Taxation as all other taxes imposed pursuant to NRS 363A.130 and
363B.110 are paid.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, of the
portion of the taxes imposed each year in excess of the amount
determined pursuant to subparagraph (1), 50 percent of that amount
must be allocated to, and when collected must be paid into, the tax
increment account pertaining to the undertaking to pay the bond
requirements of loans, money advanced to, or indebtedness, whether
funded, refunded, assumed or otherwise, incurred by the
municipality to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, the
undertaking. The remaining 50 percent of that amount must be
allocated to and when collected must be paid to the Department of
Taxation as all other taxes imposed pursuant to NRS 363A.130 and
363B.110 are paid. Unless the total amount of the taxes imposed
pursuant to NRS 363A.130 and 363B.110 on employers located in
the tax increment area exceeds the total amount of the taxes imposed
on employers located in the tax increment area in the fiscal year
-
*SB253*

– 9 –
immediately preceding the effective date of the ordinance adopted
pursuant to NRS 278C.220, all of the taxes imposed on employers
located in the tax increment area must be paid to the Department of
Taxation. When the loans, advances and indebtedness, if any, and
interest thereon, have been paid, all money thereafter received from
taxes imposed pursuant to NRS 363A.130 or 363B.110 on
employers located in the tax increment area must be paid to the
Department of Taxation as all other taxes imposed pursuant to NRS
363A.130 and 363B.110 are paid.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
360.991, the amount of the taxes levied each year which are paid
into the tax increment account pursuant to subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 and subparagraph (2) of paragraph (c) of subsection 1
must be limited by the governing body to an amount not to exceed
the combined total amount required for annual debt service of or any
outstanding advances of money or unfunded costs associated with
the project or projects acquired, improved or equipped, or any
combination thereof, as part of the undertaking.
3. Any revenues generated within the tax increment area in
excess of the amount referenced in subsection 2, if any, will be paid
into the funds of the respective taxing agencies in the same
proportion as their base amount was distributed.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, in any fiscal
year, the total revenue paid to a tax increment area pursuant to
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 in combination
with the total revenue paid to any other tax increment areas and any
redevelopment agencies of a municipality, other than any revenues
paid to any other tax increment areas pursuant to subparagraph (2)
of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 and subparagraph (2) of paragraph
(c) of subsection 1, must not exceed:
(a) In a county whose population is 100,000 or more or a city
whose population is 150,000 or more, an amount equal to the
combined tax rates of the taxing agencies for that fiscal year
multiplied by 10 percent of the total assessed valuation of the
municipality.
(b) In a county whose population is less than 100,000 or a city
whose population is less than 150,000, an amount equal to the
combined tax rates of the taxing agencies for that fiscal year
multiplied by 15 percent of the total assessed valuation of the
municipality.
 Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, if a county has
a population of less than 100,000 or if a city has a population of less
than 150,000 at the time the municipality issues securities for a tax
increment area pursuant to NRS 278C.280, the revenue limitation
-
*SB253*

– 10 –
set forth in paragraph (b) must remain the revenue limitation for the
tax increment area until such time as the securities issued for that
tax increment area pursuant to NRS 278C.280 have been paid in
full, including any securities issued to refund those securities,
regardless of whether the population of the municipality reaches or
exceeds 100,000 after the issuance of those securities.
5. If the revenue paid to a tax increment area must be limited
pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 4 and the municipality
has more than one redevelopment agency or tax increment area, or
one of each, the municipality shall determine the allocation to each
agency and area. Any revenue that would be allocated to a tax
increment area but for the provisions of this section must be paid
into the funds of the respective taxing agencies.
6. The portion of the taxes levied each year in excess of the
amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 which is attributable to any tax rate levied by a taxing
agency:
(a) To produce revenue in an amount sufficient to make annual
repayments of the principal of, and the interest on, any bonded
indebtedness that was approved by a majority of the registered
voters within the area of the taxing agency voting upon the question,
must be allocated to, and when collected must be paid into, the debt
service fund of that taxing agency.
(b) In excess of any tax rate of that taxing agency applicable to
the last taxation of the property before the effective date of the
ordinance, if that additional rate was approved by a majority of the
registered voters within the area of the taxing agency voting upon
the question, must be allocated to, and when collected must be paid
into, the appropriate fund of that taxing agency.
(c) Pursuant to NRS 387.3285 or 387.3287, if that rate was
approved by a majority of the registered voters within the area of the
taxing agency voting upon the question, must be allocated to, and
when collected must be paid into, the appropriate fund of that taxing
agency.
(d) For the support of the public schools and charter schools
within a county school district pursuant to NRS 387.195, must be
allocated to, and when collected must be paid into, the State
Education Fund [.] and State Public Charter School Facility Fund.
7. The provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection 6 include,
without limitation, a tax rate approved for bonds of a county school
district issued pursuant to NRS 350.020, including, without
limitation, amounts necessary for a reserve account in the debt
service fund.
-
*SB253*

– 11 –
8. As used in this section, the term “last equalized assessment
roll” means the assessment roll in existence on the 15th day of
March immediately preceding the effective date of the ordinance.
Sec. 8. The provisions of this act do not apply to the extent
that the provisions would constitute an impairment of the rights of
holders of the bonds or similar obligations issued by the State of
Nevada or a political subdivision thereof. If there are any such
outstanding bonds or obligations, the State of Nevada and its
officers and agencies shall take whatever actions that are deemed
necessary to protect the interests of the State and the rights of the
holders of the bonds and similar objections.
Sec. 9. The amendatory provisions of section 2 of this act:
1. Do not apply to any taxes due for any period ending on or
before June 30, 2026.
2. Must not be applied to modify, directly or indirectly, any
taxes levied or revenue pledged in such a manner as to impair
adversely any outstanding obligations of any county, including,
without limitation, bonds, medium-term financing, letters of credit
and any other financial obligation, until all such obligations have
been discharged in full or provision for their payment and
redemption has been fully made.
Sec. 10. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of performing
any preparatory administrative tasks that are necessary to carry out
the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB253*